Utah statutes.
68-4-6.   Vacancies.

(1)  Upon the death, resignation, failure, or refusal to serve of the commissioners appointed under Subsection 68-4-5(1)(a), or if the legislative member ceases to be a member of the Legislature, the commissioner's office becomes vacant; and the governor shall, with the consent of the Senate, make an appointment to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the commissioner creating the vacancy.

(2)  The commissioner who is the Legislature's general counsel or designee shall serve only during that appointment as the Legislature's general counsel.

(3) (a)  A commissioner who has been elected as a life member of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws because of long service as a commissioner with the National Conference continues the commissioner's membership in the Utah Commission on Uniform State Laws even though:

(i)  the legislative member ceases to be a member of the Legislature;

(ii)  the member of the Utah Bar's term of service expires; or

(iii)  the Legislature's general counsel ceases that service.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), the position of a commissioner who has been elected as a life member of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws as provided in Subsection (3)(a) becomes vacant and a replacement commissioner shall be provided as outlined in Section 68-4-5 if:

(i)  the legislative member ceases to be a member of the Legislature;

(ii)  the member of the Utah Bar's term of service expires; or

(iii)  if the Legislature's general counsel ceases that service.

